Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska55-164
Military leave of absence; damages for noncompliance.

If any employer fails to comply with any of the provisions of section 55-160 or 55-161, the employee may, at his or her election, bring an action at law for damages for such noncompliance. The employee may also apply to the courts for such equitable relief as may be just and proper under the circumstances.

Laws 1957, c. 238, § 3, p. 799;

R.R.S.1943, § 55-193;

Laws 1969, c. 459, § 62, p. 1602;

Laws 2002, LB 722, § 5.